Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-715
Commission on Judicial Qualifications; created; members; appointment.

Pursuant to the Constitution of the State of Nebraska, there is hereby created a Commission on Judicial Qualifications consisting of: (1) Three judges, including one district court judge, one county court judge, and one judge of any other court inferior to the Supreme Court as now exists or may hereafter be created by law, all of whom shall be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court; (2) three members of the Nebraska State Bar Association who shall have practiced law in this state for at least ten years and who shall be appointed by the Executive Council of the Nebraska State Bar Association; (3) three citizens, none of whom shall be a Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or a judge of any court, active or retired, nor a member of the Nebraska State Bar Association, and who shall be appointed by the Governor; and (4) the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, who shall serve as its chairperson.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 1, p. 430;

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 1.

This section does not grant authority to the Nebraska State Bar Association to commence disciplinary actions against sitting judges. State ex rel. NSBA v. Krepela, 259 Neb. 395, 610 N.W.2d 1 (2000).

On a showing of a compelling need for information preliminary to a judicial proceeding, limited disclosures of grand jury testimony granted. United States v. Salanitro, 437 F.Supp. 240 (D. Neb. 1977).